it: Tipo di superficie dell'essiccatore alimentare: Mesh; Perforata; Solido; Altro
ja: 食品乾燥機の表面タイプ: メッシュ; ミシン目; ソリッド; その他
sv: Yttyp på matdehydrator: Mesh; Perforerad; Solid; Övrigt
ko: 식품 건조기 표면 유형: 메쉬; 구멍 뚫림; 솔리드; 기타
pt-BR: Tipo de superfície do desidratador de alimentos: Malha; Perfurado; Maciço; Outro
lt-LT: Maisto džiovyklės padėklų paviršiaus tipas: Tinklelis; Perforuotas; Kietas; Kita
cs: Typ povrchu sušičky potravin: Síťovina; Perforovaný povrch; Plný povrch (bez perforací); Jiné
hu: Ételhordozó felület típusa: Háló; Perforált; Szilárd; Egyéb
ru: Тип поверхности лотков дегидратора: Сетчатая; Перфорированная; Сплошная; Другая
sk-SK: Typ povrchu sušičky potravín: Sieťovina; Perforovaný; Pevný; Iné
fr: Type de surface du déshydrateur: A mailles; Perforé; Solide; Autre
zh-TW: 食物乾燥機表面類型: 網眼; 穿孔式; 實心; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta površine dehidratora hrane: Mrežica; Perforirani; Čvrsti; Ostalo
vi: Loại bề mặt của máy sấy thực phẩm: Lưới; Đục lỗ; Rắn; Khác
pl: Typ powierzchni suszarki do żywności: Siatkowe; Perforowane; Pełne; Pozostałe
de: Oberflächentyp des Dörrautomaten: Netz; Perforiert; Solide; Sonstiges
th: ประเภทพื้นผิวของเครื่องอบแห้งอาหาร: ตาข่าย; แบบเจาะรู; แผ่นตัน; อื่นๆ
nl: Oppervlaktetype van de voedseldroger: Gaas; Geperforeerd; Stevig; Overig
el: Τύπος επιφάνειας αφυγραντήρα τροφίμων: Διχτυωτή; Διάτρητη; Συμπαγής; Άλλο
en: Food dehydrator surface type: Mesh; Perforated; Solid; Other
zh-CN: 食品脱水器托盘表面的类型: 网状; 带孔; 实心; 其他
da: Madtørrers overfladetype: Mesh; Perforeret; Solid; Andet
tr: Gıda kurutucu yüzey tipi: Tel örgü; Perfore; Düz; Diğer
bg-BG: Тип повърхност за дехидратиране на храна: Мрежа; Перфорирано; Плътно; Друго
es: Tipo de superficie del deshidratador de alimentos: Malla; Perforado; Sólido; Otros
ro-RO: Tipul de suprafață a deshidratorului de alimente: Plasă; Perforată; Solidă; Altele
nb: Overflatetype for matdehydrator: Mesh; Perforert; Fast; Annet
pt-PT: Tipo de superfície do desidratador de alimentos: Rede; Perfurado; Sólido; Outro
fi: Ruokakuivurin pintatyyppi: Verkko; Rei'itetty; Kiinteä; Muu
sl-SI: Vrsta površine dehidratorja hrane: Mreža; Perforirana; Trden; Druga